Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 SF 2070 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb S.F. 2070 Section 1. Section 5.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 5.1 Commission on uniform laws ââ vacancies. 3 1. The governor shall appoint three commissioners, each of 4 whom commission on uniform state laws is created, composed of 5 the following members: 6 a. One member, appointed by the governor, who shall be 7 a member in good standing of the bar of this state , in good 8 standing, who shall constitute and be known as the commission 9 on uniform state laws, and upon . 10 b. One member, appointed by the speaker of the house of 11 representatives, who shall be a member in good standing of the 12 bar of this state. 13 c. One member, appointed by the president of the senate 14 after consultation with the majority leader of the senate, who 15 shall be a member in good standing of the bar of this state. 16 2. Upon the death, resignation, or refusal to serve of any 17 of the commissioners so appointed, the governor appointing 18 authority shall make an appointment to fill the vacancy so 19 caused, such new appointment to be for the unexpired balance of 20 the term of the original appointee. 21 Sec. 2. Section 5.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 5.2 Tenure ââ compensation ââ expenses. 24 Said commissioners Commissioners shall hold office for 25 a term of four two years , beginning on February 1 of each 26 odd-numbered year , and until their successors are duly 27 appointed , but nothing herein contained shall be construed to 28 render a commissioner who has faithfully performed the duties 29 of commissioner ineligible for reappointment . A member is 30 eligible for reappointment. No member of said the commission 31 shall receive any compensation for services as a commissioner, 32 but each commissioner shall be entitled to receive actual 33 disbursements for expenses in performing the duties of the 34 office. 35 -1- SF 2070 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2070 Sec. 3. Section 5.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 5.4 Duties ââ reports. 3 The commissioners shall attend the meeting of the national 4 conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, or arrange 5 for the attendance of at least one of their number at the 6 national conference, and both in and out of the national 7 conference they shall do all in their power to promote 8 uniformity in state laws, upon all subjects where uniformity is 9 deemed desirable and practicable. The commission shall report 10 submit to the legislative council of the general assembly, an 11 account of its transactions, and its advice and recommendations 12 for legislation. This report shall be printed for presentation 13 to the council the commissionâs expenses under section 5.2 for 14 approval . The council commission shall submit the a report 15 of recommended legislation to the speaker of the house and 16 president of the senate who shall forward it the report to the 17 appropriate committees of the general assembly for further 18 study. The commission shall bring about as far as practicable 19 the uniform judicial interpretation of all uniform laws and 20 generally devise and recommend additional legislation or other 21 or further course of action as shall tend to accomplish the 22 purposes of this chapter . 23 Sec. 4. TRANSITION PROVISION. Notwithstanding any 24 provision of law to the contrary, members of the commission on 25 uniform state laws serving on the effective date of this Act 26 shall serve until January 31, 2027, and until their successors 27 are duly appointed, or until the member ceases to hold office, 28 whichever occurs first. 29 -2- SF 2070 (3) 91 ss/ns/mb 2/ 2